Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1332
City or county employee changed by Legislature to state employee; vesting of prior service retirement benefits; application; vested benefits.

(1) Any city or county employee who is a member under a city or county employees retirement system, including retirement systems authorized by section 23-1118, and whose status as a city or county employee is changed by the Legislature to that of a state employee shall, upon application to the Public Employees Retirement Board and to the city or county or to the county board of a county having a retirement system authorized by section 23-1118, obtain full and immediate vesting in any prior service retirement benefits and any future service retirement benefits which have been accrued to the date of transfer, except that the employee may withdraw the amount in his or her employee account prior to his or her retirement as provided in section 84-1321. Each employee's service as a city or county employee, after he or she has attained the minimum age required under the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska and has completed two years of service, shall be credited as though it were participation in the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska for purposes of calculating the termination benefits established by section 84-1321. Such service shall be counted as state service for purposes of calculating entitlement to retirement benefits under section 84-1319.

(2) Any city or county employee whose status as a city or county employee is or has been changed by the Legislature to that of a state employee shall be eligible for immediate participation in the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska with no minimum period of service required if the minimum age requirement of the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska is satisfied, or if the minimum age requirement is not satisfied on the date of transfer, the employee shall be eligible to participate at the date he or she satisfies the minimum age requirement.

Laws 1973, LB 573, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 27;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 86;

Laws 1986, LB 325, § 22;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 38;

Laws 1987, LB 549, § 13.